California, session 20252026, AB1655.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) All children are precious, and their childhood is sacred and worth protection by the government.(2) Raids by the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) and military occupation have stolen the joy of childhood for countless children and have replaced it with fear and danger.(3) During the first Trump administration, family separations were pursued by taking children from their parents when they crossed the southern border, but this practice was stopped with litigation.(4) Now, under the second Trump administration, family separation is being deployed as a tactic to terrorize immigrant communities across the country.(5) In 2025, ICE set a new record for how many children were taken into custody.(6) There have been several high-profile cases of citizen children and other children with legal status being unlawfully arrested and detained.(7) Here, in California, Benjamin Guerrero-Cruz, a student at Reseda Charter High School was detained by federal agents while walking his dog. He was held in ICE custody at the Adelanto Detention Center for over three months, causing him to miss the start of his senior year.(8) This is just one of the dozens of instances in California where children have been arrested and detained, some violently, some at gunpoint.(9) These children will forever be impacted by the violence of ICE arrests and detention. As California leaders work to find a resolution to these ICE raids, there are steps that California can take now to protect these youth and their families from economic harm as a result of childhood ICE detention.(10) California’s CalWORKs program was established to protect the basic needs and lifetime opportunities of children in households that are impoverished.(11) Due to an existing program rule, a child’s portion of the family’s very small CalWORKs grant must be reduced if the child is placed in an institution, though there are exemptions to this rule for temporary absences as set forth in law.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to extend statutory exemptions under the CalWORKs program in order to protect a family with an eligible child detained by ICE from losing portions of their basic needs grant as a result.SEC. 2. Section 11269 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:11269. (a) A child who is a patient in a public or private hospital for medical or surgical care shall be considered temporarily absent from the home for the duration of the hospital stay.(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11269, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed. SEC. 3. Section 11269 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:11269. (a) For the purposes of determining cash aid for CalWORKs, a child who is a patient in a public or private hospital for medical or surgical care shall be considered temporarily absent from the home for the duration of the hospital stay.(b) (1) For the purposes of determining cash aid for CalWORKs, a child or other member of the assistance unit who is detained in a federal immigration detention facility shall be considered temporarily absent from the home for the duration of the detention. The assistance unit shall continue to remain eligible to receive continued assistance and services for this period if both of the following conditions are met: (A) The remaining members of the assistance unit continue to meet eligibility requirements.(B) If the member or members are held in detention outside of the state, the detained member or members intend to return to the state once they are released from detention.(2) A sworn statement by the applicant or recipient shall be sufficient to establish a report was submitted that a member of the assistance unit has been detained in an immigration detention facility for purposes of this subdivision.(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement and administer this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.SEC. 4. No appropriation pursuant to Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made for purposes of this act.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.